Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2617.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title and sections 1 and 2 of the act of October 22, 2014 (P.L.2611, No.165), known as the State Agency Green Technology Implementation Act, are amended to read:AN ACTProviding for the testing of new, environmentally beneficial [and], energy-efficient and cost-reductive technologies within various State agencies.Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the State Agency Green [Technology] and Emerging Technologies Implementation Act.Section 2. Legislative intent.1234567891011121314151617181920 The General Assembly finds as follows:(1) It is the responsibility of the General Assembly to ensure that the resources of this Commonwealth are used in a manner consistent with energy efficiency and financial and environmental stewardship.(2) As technology advances, opportunities arise to test new technologies within this Commonwealth's State agencies in order to increase energy conservation, improve operational efficiency, reduce costs and promote demand-side management.(3) Through the testing of new, energy-efficient or cost-reductive technologies, the Department of General Services will gain the ability to identify new ways to reduce costs and improve efficiency, creating an avenue for implementation of all State agencies upon the recommendation of the Secretary of General Services and the testing agency.Section 2. The definition of "State agency" in section 3 of the act is amended to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"State agency." An executive agency, an independent agency, a State-affiliated entity or a State-related institution as defined by 62 Pa.C.S. § 103 (relating to definitions), including the unified judicial system and its officers and agencies, that for the purposes of this act will be testing a new technology, product or process in order to determine its effectiveness in promoting energy conservation, energy efficiency, State agency operational efficiency or cost reduction or demand-side 20260HB2617PN3569 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 management, which new technology, product or process conforms to the high-performance building standards adopted by the Department of General Services under section 307(c) of the act of July 9, 2008 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Alternative Energy Investment Act.Section 3. Section 4(1) introductory paragraph and (i) introductory paragraph, (4) introductory paragraph and (i), (5) and (6) of the act are amended and paragraph (4) is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:Section 4. Authority of secretary.The following shall apply:(1) If, in the course of the secretary's official duties, the secretary determines that the use of a certain technology, product or process would promote energy conservation, energy efficiency, State agency operational efficiency or cost reduction or demand-side management, the secretary may authorize a State agency to test the technology, product or process by using it in the agency's operations on a trial basis. The following shall apply:(i) The purpose of a test program shall be to validate the effectiveness and feasibility of the technology, product or process in reducing energy usage and costs [or], promoting demand-side management or improving State agency operational efficiency. No agency shall undertake testing of any technology, product or process unless the business entity manufacturing or marketing the technology, product or process demonstrates that:* * *(4) The secretary may not authorize a State agency to 20260HB2617PN3569 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 test a technology, product or process unless the technology or product being tested has been certified by an approved, independent, nationally recognized testing or certification program that the technology, product or process will produce energy savings or State agency operational efficiencies at the level it claims and under conditions similar to the test to be conducted or the technology or product being tested has been procured by a state government of another state. The following shall apply:(i) The business entity manufacturing or marketing the technology, product or process shall provide proof of procurement by a state government or its independent, nationally recognized testing or certification in a form and manner as determined by the department, and the department shall accept and approve of the testing or certification before testing may take place at a State agency.* * *(iii) For technologies, products or processes intended to improve State agency operational efficiency or reduce costs, the business entity manufacturing or marketing the technology, product or process shall provide proof of an assessment of the potential viability of a pilot test program of the technology, product or process at the agency conducted by an independent consulting firm or a market research firm that specializes in market research for similar technologies, products or processes. The independent consulting firm or market research firm must possess North American Industry Classification System Code 541910 for Market Research and 20260HB2617PN3569 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Public Opinion Polling.(5) If the secretary determines that the test program sufficiently demonstrates that the technology, product or process reduces energy usage [and] or costs [or], promotes demand-side management or improves State agency operational efficiency, and the testing agency determines that the product meets its independent requirements, if any, for technology, product or process testing and acceptance, the secretary and the administrative head of the testing agency may procure the technology, product or process in accordance with 62 Pa.C.S. (relating to procurement), including through addition of the technology, product or process to a department Statewide requirements contract of proper scope if determined to be appropriate by the secretary. Testing agencies with independent procurement authority under 62 Pa.C.S. may procure the item or authorize its use in accordance with that authority. The secretary may encourage implementation in any or all State agencies. Testing criteria, protocol, metrics and goals shall be developed by the department. At a minimum, the testing shall be designed to replicate the results attested to by the approved, independent, nationally recognized testing or certification program.(6) If the secretary determines that the test program does not sufficiently demonstrate that the technology, product or process reduces energy usage [and] or costs [or], promotes demand-side management or improves State agency operational efficiency, at the secretary's direction, the business entity manufacturing or marketing this technology, product or process shall be responsible for removing the 20260HB2617PN3569 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 product and returning the agency's facility back to its original status at the cost of the business entity in the time frame provided.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2617PN3569 - 6 - 1234